Alabama, session 2026rs, SB120.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the Tristan Hollis Memorial Act.
Section 2. (a) Each state, county, and municipal law
enforcement agency that conducts emergency response and
vehicular pursuits shall adopt written policies, consistent
Page 1

vehicular pursuits shall adopt written policies, consistent
SB120 INTRODUCED
with this section, that set forth the manner in which these
operations shall be conducted. Each law enforcement agency may
create its own policy or adopt an existing model, consistent
with this section. A vehicular pursuit policy created or
adopted by a law enforcement agency must address situations in
which police pursuits cross over into other jurisdictions. A
law enforcement agency that fails to adopt a policy in
accordance with this section is subject to the withholding of
any state funding or state-administered federal funding.
(b) No state, county, or municipal law enforcement
agency shall authorize the engagement of a vehicular pursuit
unless:
(1) The requirements of Section 32-5A-7, Code of
Alabama 1975, are met; and
(2) Probable cause exists to believe that the
individual being pursued has committed or is committing any of
the following offenses:
a. Murder, as provided in Section 13A-6-2, Code of
Alabama 1975.
b. Burglary in the first degree, as provided in Section
13A-7-5, Code of Alabama 1975.
c. Kidnapping in the first degree, as provided in
Section 13A-6-43, Code of Alabama 1975.
d. Human trafficking in the first degree, as provided
in Section 13A-6-152, Code of Alabama 1975.
e. Rape in the first degree, as provided in Section
13A-6-61, Code of Alabama 1975.
f. Sodomy in the first degree, as provided in Section
Page 2

f. Sodomy in the first degree, as provided in Section
SB120 INTRODUCED
13A-6-63, Code of Alabama 1975.
g. Sexual torture, as provided in Section 13A-6-65.1,
Code of Alabama 1975.
h. Domestic violence in the first degree, as provided
in 13A-6-130, Code of Alabama 1975.
i. Arson in the first degree, as provided in Section
13A-7-41, Code of Alabama 1975.
j. Robbery in the first degree, as provided in Section
13A-8-41, Code of Alabama 1975.
k. Terrorism, as provided in Section 13A-10-152, Code
of Alabama 1975.
l. Aggravated child abuse, as provided in Section
26-15-3.1, Code of Alabama 1975.
m. Any offense that creates an immediate threat of
death or serious bodily injury to another individual or a
substantial threat to the safety of another individual.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3